Illinois, session 104th, HB1269.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 510-31 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-31 new)7    Sec. 10-31. Self-report surveys. 8    (a) For purposes of this Section, "personal, protected 9information" means any information related to any topic 10protected under the federal Protection of Pupil Rights 11Amendment of 1978. 12    (b) If a school district administers a self-report survey 13to its students that may reveal personal, protected 14information, no student under the age of 18 is required to take 15or participate in the self-report survey unless parental or 16guardian consent is given in writing. Prior to the self-report 17survey being administered, a parent or guardian shall be 18afforded the opportunity to review, either electronically or 19in person, the scope of the questions to be asked. Refusal to 20grant consent for a student to participate in the self-report 21survey shall not be a reason for disciplinary action, academic 22penalty, suspension, or expulsion or any other sanction of the 23student.   HB1269- 2 -LRB104 03205 LNS 13226 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.